public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
adintar/A
albitrar/A
dexalborar/A
alteridar/A
amaređar/A
reandar/A
angarexar/A
arxentar/A
arxenar/A
armixar/A
arsirar/A
atergar/A
aŧetar/A
auspikar/A
axardar/A
badar/A
bagateƚar/A
bajar/A
inbakukar/A
xbaƚar/A
inbalokar/A
inbaƚonar/A
baƚotar/A
strabalsar/A
bandedar/A
xbandonar/A
barafuxoƚar/A
xbarasar/A
barikar/A
xbarosar/A
inbastardir/A
batiđar/A
batolar/A
dexbaular/A
xbavasar/A
xbefar/A
bekolar/A
inberlar/A
inbestialir/A
xbevakiar/A
xbiankar/A
biasar/A
inbiƚar/A
bindolar/A
biondixar/A
biskotar/A
blaterar/A
rebójer/A
xbokolar/A
bonir/A
xborir/A
xborsar/A
aboŧar/A
brakexar/A
inbrandir/A
inbrenar/A
xbrodegar/A
brondolar/A
budelar/A
dexbusolar/A
buxnar/A
scausar/A
recèñer/A
cicoƚar/A
cokoƚatar/A
kondanar/A
indeñar/A
diladiar/A
indogar/A
indomar/A
dexdorar/A
radreŧar/A
sedúxer/A
xavajar/A
xogatolar/A
raxónxer/A
xugolar/A
straxurar/A
reelèxer/A
espèƚer/A
exitar/A
desfabrikar/A
faƚivar/A
desfangar/A
fasar/A
fortifegar/A
feƚisitar/A
referir/A
sfetar/A
desfibrar/A
desfiƚar/A
definir/A
infisir/A
influenŧar/A
afoƚar/A
forfar/A
desfornir/A
infradeƚar/A
sfrànxer/A
sfrasar/A
sfrexar/A
frondeđar/A
sfugasar/A
futuriđar/A
gaƚantejar/A
ingalopar/A
xgañolir/A
xgardufar/A
ingaxiar/A
godegar/A
xgorgeđar/A
dexgranar/A
ingrapejar/A
grexar/A
xgretolir/A
dexgritolir/A
xgronŧolar/A
guŧar/A
xguindoƚar/A
imaxinar/A
iniŧiar/A
integrar/A
ipotidar/A
xjansar/A
ɉegomarar/A
rejetar/A
joŧolar/A
kair/A
kagar/A
kaƚigar/A
inkalotir/A
kaluñar/A
inkandir/A
kantar/A
inkapelar/A
inkapusar/A
deskarnar/A
skartabelar/A
skasegar/A
inkatejar/A
prokaŧar/A
skavalkar/A
konklúder/A
kojonar/A
koƚegar/A
komensar/A
skonéter/A
konotar/A
kontroƚar/A
kórer/A
akòrxer/A
inkornidar/A
skosar/A
kovèrxer/A
krepar/A
skrokar/A
krostoƚixar/A
skuaɉar/A
kuereƚar/A
kuƚatar/A
kusar/A
ƚanbikar/A
laorar/A
tralasar/A
xlavinar/A
deƚegar/A
lestir/A
xlexerir/A
xlipegar/A
liñar/A
lokar/A
xlontanar/A
xludronar/A
relúxer/A
makar/A
manaŧar/A
mantedar/A
xmarasar/A
martirixar/A
xmaskarar/A
dexmaŧar/A
mediar/A
xmedar/A
mentir/A
xmersiar/A
parametriđar/A
deminuir/A
mòɉer/A
xmolacar/A
montar/A
xmorbar/A
xmorŧar/A
inmucarar/A
murar/A
xmuxegar/A
naufragar/A
xnervaxar/A
nolar/A
nòxer/A
xñaoƚar/A
odorar/A
òlder/A
ónđer/A
orđar/A
ortrigar/A
inpacoƚar/A
spaɉar/A
spaletar/A
palpexar/A
konpanidar/A
papolar/A
paredar/A
parteŧipar/A
apasionar/A
patir/A
inpaŧientar/A
pekar/A
trapelar/A
depenar/A
pendoƚar/A
inpeocar/A
personalidar/A
petexar/A
inpetrir/A
spianar/A
piàxer/A
pikoƚir/A
despionbar/A
pospoƚar/A
pisolar/A
inpocar/A
spolverar/A
kontrapóner/A
spontar/A
ponxetar/A
sporteƚar/A
despotifar/A
inpresar/A
prexúmer/A
protokoƚar/A
inpuñar/A
puŧar/A
rakoƚar/A
rankurar/A
raspar/A
recixar/A
xregolar/A
retribuir/A
riŧar/A
ròder/A
roinar/A
ronkolar/A
rovejar/A
rufianar/A
inruvidir/A
sakeđar/A
saleđar/A
saƚudar/A
sartorar/A
scantinar/A
sediar/A
segregar/A
aseɉar/A
inselvadigir/A
strasentir/A
serbar/A
sfraxenar/A
desiɉilar/A
insinuar/A
skaƚar/A
skarpeƚar/A
skaturir/A
skiŧar/A
skravaŧar/A
skrivakiar/A
soƚer/A
solfarar/A
insonolir/A
sotilidar/A
sparañar/A
spenotar/A
spianŧar/A
traspirar/A
spronar/A
restabiƚir/A
stankeđar/A
istekir/A
stimar/A
stivalar/A
destrakar/A
strénxer/A
strolegar/A
destuar/A
strasuar/A
asunar/A
tabakar/A
tajusar/A
tanbarar/A
retardar/A
tasteđar/A
intaxar/A
preinténder/A
tenporejar/A
asteñir/A
retèñer/A
interar/A
intestar/A
tiranejar/A
coler/A
tonidar/A
torkoƚar/A
destòrder/A
intovaɉar/A
trakanar/A
trapar/A
tratidar/A
stremir/A
strikolar/A
tronbiđar/A
trusidar/A
deŧakolar/A
saponar/A
interŧéder/A
sentrar/A
inŧercelar/A
sertar/A
desíder/A
sigolar/A
siolar/A
ŧitir/A
inŧolar/A
inŧupar/A
urmar/A
vagar/A
xvaƚixar/A
xvaporar/A
prevéder/A
reveƚir/A
deventar/A
deskonveñir/A
revèñer/A
inverđelar/A
verigolar/A
malversar/A
xvestir/A
viƚir/A
rekonvínser/A
vixilar/A
xvogasar/A
xvoƚar/A
revoltolar/A
xafar/A
xbacar/A
inxeƚoxir/A
xirar/A
xmeriƚiar/A
prexudegar/A
aidàr/A
regolariđar/A
antefàser/A
fàxer/A
kontrobàter/A
supervixionar/A
kridar/A
inɉasar/A
ɉòƚer/A
rebekolar/A
xbrisolar/A
xgaƚinar/A
spaurir/A
trancar/A
buƚar/A
kospetiđar/A
insipidir/A
